Utah statutes.
7-9-27.   Dividends -- Interest refunds.

(1) After allocations to required reserves, a credit union may declare and pay a dividend from current earnings and undivided earnings at the discretion of the board of directors and as provided in its bylaws.

(2)  Dividends may be paid at different rates on different types or sizes of accounts.

(3)  The board of directors may authorize any interest refunds on such classes of loans and under such conditions as the board authorizes.

(4)  A credit union need not pay a dividend on any account less than the par value of one share.

